California statutes. Corporations Code
(c) Amended articles authorized by this section shall include the provisions which would have been required (other than the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the name of the initial agent for service of process if a statement has been filed pursuant to Section 6210), and may in addition only include those provisions which would have been permitted, in original articles filed by the type of corporation (mutual benefit, religious, business, social purpose, or cooperative) into which the public benefit corporation is changing its status.

(d) In the case of a change of status to a business
 corporation, social purpose corporation, or cooperative corporation, if the Franchise Tax Board has issued a determination exempting the corporation from tax as provided in Section 23701 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the corporation shall be subject to Section 23221 of the Revenue and Taxation Code upon filing the certificate of amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 68.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.

(a) Except for amendments adopted by the incorporators pursuant to Section 5811, upon adoption of an amendment, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment, which shall consist of an officers’ certificate stating:

(1) The wording of the amendment or amended articles in accordance with Section 5816;

(2) That the amendment has been approved by the board;

(3) If the amendment is one for which the approval of the members (Section 5034) is required, that the amendment was approved by the required vote of members; and

(4) If the amendment is one which may be adopted with approval by the board alone, a statement of the facts entitling the board alone to adopt the amendment. 

(5) If the amendment is one for which the approval of a person or persons other than the incorporators, directors, or members is required, that the approval of such person or persons has been obtained.

(b) In the event of an amendment of the articles pursuant to a merger, the filing of the officers’ certificate and agreement pursuant to Section 6014 shall be in lieu of any filing required under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.

In the case of amendments adopted by the incorporators under Section 5811, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators which shall state that the signers thereof constitute at least a majority of the incorporators, that directors were not named in the original articles and have not been elected, that the corporation has no members and that they adopt the amendment or amendments therein set forth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5816.

The certificate of amendment shall establish the wording of the amendment or amended articles by one or more of the following means:

(a) By stating that the articles shall be amended to read as therein set forth in full.

(b) By stating that any provision of the articles, which shall be identified by the numerical or other designation given it in the articles or by stating the wording thereof, shall be stricken from the articles or shall be amended to read as set forth in the certificate.

(c) By stating that the provisions set forth therein shall be added to the articles.

If the purpose of the amendment is to reclassify, cancel, exchange, or otherwise change outstanding memberships, the amended articles shall state the effect thereof on outstanding memberships.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5817.

Upon the filing of the certificate of amendment, the articles shall be amended in accordance with the certificate and any change, reclassification, or cancellation of memberships shall be effected, and a copy of the certificate, certified by the Secretary of State, is prima facie evidence of the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of the amendment. The Secretary of State shall make available the filed certificate of amendment to the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 53.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5818.

A corporation formed for a limited period may at any time subsequent to the expiration of the term of its corporate existence, extend the term of its existence by an amendment to its articles removing any provision limiting the term of its existence and providing for perpetual existence. If the filing of the certificate of amendment providing for perpetual existence would be prohibited if it were original articles by the provisions of Section 5122, the Secretary of State shall not file such certificate unless, by the same or a concurrently filed certificate of amendment, the articles of such corporation are amended to adopt a new available name. For the purpose of the adoption of any such amendment, persons who have been functioning as directors of such corporation shall be considered to have been validly elected even though their election may have occurred after the expiration of the original term of the corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.

(a) A corporation may restate in a single certificate the entire text of its articles as amended by filing an officers’ certificate or, in circumstances where incorporators or the board may amend a corporation’s articles pursuant to Sections 5811 and 5815, a certificate signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators or the board, as applicable, entitled “Restated Articles of Incorporation of (insert name of corporation)” that shall set forth the articles as amended to the date of filing of the certificate, except that the signatures and acknowledgments of the articles by the incorporators and any statements regarding the effect of any prior amendment upon memberships and any provisions of agreements of
 merger (other than amendments to the articles of the surviving corporation), and the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the names and addresses of the first directors and of the initial agent for service of process shall be omitted (except that the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the names and addresses of the initial agent for service of process and, if previously set forth in the articles, the initial directors, shall not be omitted prior to the time that the corporation has filed a statement under Section 6210). Those omissions are not alterations or amendments of the articles. The certificate may also itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, in which case the certificate must comply with Section 5814 or 5815, as the case may be, and Section 5816.

(b) If the certificate does not itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, it shall be approved by the board or, prior to the issuance of any memberships and the naming and election of directors, by a majority of the incorporators, and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to an amendment of the articles not requiring approval of the members (Section 5034). If the certificate does itself alter or amend the articles, it shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the amendment or amendments so made.

(c) Restated articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section shall supersede for all purposes the original articles and all amendments filed prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 17.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5820.

(a) Amendment of the articles of a corporation, pursuant to this chapter, does not, of itself, abrogate any requirement or limitation imposed upon the corporation, or any property held by it, by virtue of the trust under which such property is held by the corporation.

(b) The Attorney General may, at the corporation’s request, and pursuant to such regulations as the Attorney General may issue, give rulings as to whether the Attorney General will or may oppose a proposed action, or article amendment, as inconsistent with or proscribed by the requirements of a charitable trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Sales of Assets [5910. - 5930.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5910. - 5913.]

5910.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge or other hypothecation of all or any part of the corporation’s property, real or personal, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any contract or obligation may be approved by the board. Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, no approval of the members (Section 5034) shall be necessary for such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 5142, a corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms are:

(1) Approved by the board; and

(2) Unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities, approved by the members (Section 5034) and by any other person or persons whose approval is required by the articles, either before or after approval by the board and before or after the transaction.

(b) Notwithstanding approval by the members (Section 5034) or such other person, the board may abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the members, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 5142, such sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer or other disposition may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the corporation. The consideration may be money, property, or securities of any domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or foreign business corporation or any of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5912.

Any deed or instrument conveying or otherwise transferring any assets of a corporation may have annexed to it the certificate of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, setting forth that the transaction has been validly approved by the board, that the notice, if any, required by Section 5913 has been given and (a) stating that the property described in such deed or instrument is less than substantially all of the assets of the corporation or that the transfer is in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, if such be the case, or (b) if such property constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of the corporation and the transfer is not in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, stating the fact of approval thereof by the members (Section 5034). Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts authorizing such conveyance or other transfer of the assets and conclusive evidence in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer for value who, without notice of any trust restriction applicable to the property or any failure to comply therewith, in good faith parted with value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5913.

Except for an agreement or transaction subject to Section 5914 or 5920, a corporation shall give written notice to the Attorney General 20 days before it sells, leases, conveys, exchanges, transfers or otherwise disposes of all or substantially all of its assets unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities or unless the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this section as to the proposed transaction. This section shall not apply to a public benefit corporation that is exempt from the supervisory authority of the Attorney General pursuant to Sections 12581 and 12583 of the Government Code by virtue of being a committee, as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code, that is required to and does file any
 statement pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 7.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Health Facilities [5914. - 5930.]

5914.

(a) (1) Any nonprofit corporation that is defined in Section 5046 and operates or controls a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or operates or controls a facility that provides similar health care, regardless of whether it is currently operating or providing health care services or has a suspended license, shall be required to provide written notice to, and to obtain the written consent of, the Attorney General prior to entering into any agreement or transaction to do either of the following:

(A) Sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey, or otherwise dispose of, its assets to a
 for-profit corporation or entity or to a mutual benefit corporation or entity when a material amount of the assets of the nonprofit corporation are involved in the agreement or transaction.

(B) Transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material amount of the assets or operations of the nonprofit corporation to any for-profit corporation or entity or to any mutual benefit corporation or entity.

(2) The substitution of a new corporate member or members that transfers the control of, responsibility for, or governance of the nonprofit corporation shall be deemed a transfer for purposes of this article. The substitution of one or more members of the governing body, or any arrangement, written or oral, that would transfer voting control of the members of the governing body,
 shall also be deemed a transfer for purposes of this article.

(b) The notice to the Attorney General provided for in this section shall include and contain the information the Attorney General determines is required. The notice, including any other information provided to the Attorney General under this article, and that is in the public file, shall be made available by the Attorney General to the public in written form, as soon as is practicable after it is received by the Attorney General. The notice shall include a list of the primary languages spoken at the facility and the threshold languages for Medi-Cal beneficiaries, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services for the county in which the facility is located. The Attorney General
 may require the nonprofit corporation to provide certain components of the notice in any of these languages.

(c) This section shall not apply to a nonprofit corporation if the agreement or transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities or if the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this section as to the proposed agreement or transaction.

(d) This section shall apply to any foreign nonprofit corporation that operates or controls a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or a facility that provides similar health care, regardless of whether it is currently operating or providing health care services or has a suspended
 license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5915.

Within 90 days of the receipt of the written notice required by Section 5914, the Attorney General shall notify the public benefit corporation in writing of the decision to consent to, give conditional consent to, or not consent to the agreement or transaction. The Attorney General may extend this period for one additional 45-day period if any of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The extension is necessary to obtain information pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5919.

(b) The proposed agreement or transaction is substantially modified after the first public meeting conducted by the Attorney General
 in accordance with Section 5916.

(c) The proposed agreement or transaction involves a multifacility health system serving multiple communities, rather than a single facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5916.

Prior to issuing any written decision referred to in Section 5915, or giving a written waiver under subdivision (c) of Section 5914, the Attorney General shall conduct one or more public meetings, one of which shall be in the county in which the facility is located, to hear comments from interested parties. At least 14 days before conducting the public meeting, the Attorney General shall provide written notice of the time and place of the meeting through publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the affected community and to the board of supervisors of the county in which the facility is located. This notice shall be provided in English and in the primary languages spoken at the facility and the threshold
 languages for Medi-Cal beneficiaries, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services for the county in which the facility is located. If a substantive change in the proposed agreement or transaction is submitted to the Attorney General after the initial public meeting, the Attorney General may conduct an additional public meeting to hear comments from interested parties with respect to that change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 3.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5917.

The Attorney General shall have discretion to consent to, give conditional consent to, or not consent to any agreement or transaction described in subdivision (a) of Section 5914. In making the determination, the Attorney General shall consider any factors that the Attorney General deems relevant, including, but not limited to, whether any of the following apply:

(a) The terms and conditions of the agreement or transaction are fair and reasonable to the nonprofit corporation.

(b) The agreement or transaction will result in inurement to any private person or entity.

(c) Any agreement or transaction that is subject to this article is at fair market value. In this regard, “fair market value” means the most likely price that the assets being sold would bring in a competitive and open market under all conditions requisite to a fair sale, the buyer and seller, each acting prudently, knowledgeably and in their own best interest, and a reasonable time being allowed for exposure in the open market.

(d) The market value has been manipulated by the actions of the parties in a manner that causes the value of the assets to decrease.

(e) The proposed use of the proceeds from the agreement or transaction is consistent with the charitable trust on which the assets are held by the health facility or by the affiliated nonprofit health
 system.

(f) The agreement or transaction involves or constitutes any breach of trust.

(g) The Attorney General has been provided, pursuant to Section 5250, with sufficient information and data by the nonprofit corporation to evaluate adequately the agreement or transaction or the effects thereof on the public.

(h) The agreement or transaction may create a significant effect on the availability or accessibility of health care services to the affected community.

(i) The proposed agreement or transaction is in the public interest.

(j) The agreement or transaction may create a significant effect
 on the availability and accessibility of cultural interests provided by the facility in the affected community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5917.5.

The Attorney General shall not consent to a health facility agreement or transaction pursuant to Section 5914 or Section 5920 in which the seller restricts the type or level of medical services that may be provided at the health facility that is the subject of the agreement or transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5918.

The Attorney General may adopt regulations implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1105, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5919.

(a) Within the time periods designated in Section 5915 and relating to those factors specified in Section 5917, the Attorney General may do the following:

(1) Contract with, consult, and receive advice from any state agency on those terms and conditions that the Attorney General deems appropriate.

(2) In his or her sole discretion, contract with experts or consultants to assist in reviewing the proposed agreement or transaction.

(b) Contract costs shall not exceed an amount that is reasonable and necessary to conduct the review and evaluation. Any contract entered into under this section shall be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The nonprofit corporation, upon request, shall pay the Attorney General promptly for all contract costs.

(c) The Attorney General shall be entitled to reimbursement from the nonprofit corporation for all actual, reasonable, direct costs incurred in reviewing, evaluating, and making the determination referred to in this article, including administrative costs. The nonprofit corporation shall promptly pay the Attorney General, upon request, for all of those costs.

(d) (1) In order to monitor effectively ongoing compliance with the terms and conditions of any sale or transfer of assets subject to Section 5914, including, but not limited to, the ongoing use of the charitable assets in a manner consistent with the trust pursuant to which they are held, the Attorney General may, in his or her sole discretion, contract with experts and consultants to assist in this regard.

(2) Contract costs shall not exceed an amount that is reasonable and necessary to conduct the review and evaluation. Any contract entered into under this section shall be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The nonprofit corporation shall pay the Attorney General promptly for all contract costs.

(3) The Attorney General shall be entitled to reimbursement from either the selling or the acquiring corporation, depending upon which one the burden of compliance falls, for all actual, reasonable, and direct costs incurred in monitoring ongoing compliance with the terms and conditions of the sale or transfer of assets, including contract and administrative costs. The Attorney General may bill either the selling or the acquiring corporation and the corporation billed by the Attorney General shall promptly pay for all of those costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 427, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5920.

(a) (1) Any nonprofit corporation that is defined in Section 5046 and operates or controls a health care facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or operates or controls a facility that provides similar health care, regardless of whether it is currently operating or providing health care services or has a suspended license, shall be required to provide written notice to, and to obtain the written consent of, the Attorney General prior to entering into any agreement or transaction to do either of the following:

(A) Sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey, or otherwise dispose of, its assets to
 another nonprofit corporation or entity when a material amount of the assets of the nonprofit corporation are involved in the agreement or transaction.

(B) Transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material amount of the assets or operations of the nonprofit corporation to another nonprofit corporation or entity.

(2) The substitution of a new corporate member or members that transfers the control of, responsibility for, or governance of the nonprofit corporation, the substitution of one or more members of the governing body that would transfer voting control of the members of the governing body, or any arrangement, written or oral, that would transfer voting control of the entity shall be deemed a transfer for purposes of this article.

(b) The notice to the Attorney General provided for in this section shall contain the information the Attorney General determines is required. The notice, including any other information provided to the Attorney General under this article, and that is the public file, shall be made available by the Attorney General to the public in written form, as soon as is practicable after it is received by the Attorney General. The notice to the Attorney General shall include a list of the primary languages spoken at the facility and the threshold languages for Medi-Cal beneficiaries as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services for the county in which the facility is located. The Attorney General may require the nonprofit corporation to provide certain components of the notice in any of those languages.

(c) This section shall not apply to a nonprofit corporation if the agreement or transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities or if the Attorney General has given the corporation a written waiver of this section as to the proposed agreement or transaction.

(d) This section shall apply to any foreign nonprofit corporation that operates or controls a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or a facility that provides similar health care, regardless of whether it is currently operating or providing health care services or has a suspended license.

(e) This section shall not apply to an agreement or transaction if the other party to the agreement or transaction is an
 affiliate, as defined in Section 5031, of the transferring nonprofit corporation or entity, and the corporation or entity has given the Attorney General 20 days advance notice of the agreement or transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 5.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5921.

Within 90 days of the receipt of the written notice required by Section 5920, the Attorney General shall notify the nonprofit corporation in writing of the decision to consent to, give conditional consent to, or not consent to the agreement or transaction. The Attorney General may extend this period for one additional 45-day period if any of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The extension is necessary to obtain relevant information from any state agency, experts, or consultants.

(b) The proposed agreement or transaction is substantially modified after the first public meeting conducted by the
 Attorney General in accordance with Section 5922.

(c) The proposed agreement or transaction involves a multifacility health system serving multiple communities, rather than a single facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 6.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5922.

Prior to issuing any written decision referred to in Section 5921, or giving a written waiver under subdivision (c) of Section 5920, the Attorney General shall conduct one or more public meetings, one of which shall be in the county in which the facility is located, to hear comments from interested parties. At least 14 days before conducting the public meeting, the Attorney General shall provide written notice of the time and place of the meeting through publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the affected community and to the board of supervisors of the county in which the facility is located. This notice shall be provided in
 English and in the primary languages spoken at the facility and the threshold languages for Medi-Cal beneficiaries as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services for the county in which the facility is located. If a substantive change in the proposed agreement or transaction is submitted to the Attorney General after the initial public meeting, the Attorney General may conduct an additional public meeting to hear comments from interested parties with respect to that change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   (AB 174)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5923.

The Attorney General shall have discretion to consent to, give conditional consent to, or not consent to any agreement or transaction described in subdivision (a) of Section 5920. In making the determination, the Attorney General shall consider any factors that the Attorney General deems relevant, including, but not limited to, whether any of the following apply:

(a) The terms and conditions of the agreement or transaction are fair and reasonable to the nonprofit corporation.

(b) The agreement or transaction will result in inurement to any private person or entity.

(c) Fair market value of the agreement or transaction, meaning the most likely price that the assets being sold would bring in a competitive and open market under all conditions requisite to a fair sale, the buyer and seller, each acting prudently, knowledgeably, and in their own best interest, and a reasonable time being allowed for exposure in the open market.

(d) The market value has been manipulated by the actions of the parties in a manner that causes the value of the assets to decrease.

(e) The proposed use of the proceeds from the agreement or transaction is consistent with the charitable trust on which the assets are held by the health facility or by the affiliated nonprofit health system.

(f) The agreement or transaction involves or constitutes any breach of trust.

(g) The Attorney General has been provided, pursuant to Section 5250, with sufficient information and data by the nonprofit public benefit corporation to evaluate adequately the agreement or transaction or the effects thereof on the public.

(h) The agreement or transaction may create a significant effect on the availability or accessibility of health care services to the affected community.

(i) The proposed agreement or transaction is in the public interest.

(j) The agreement or transaction may create a significant effect on the availability and accessibility of cultural
 interests provided by the facility in the affected community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 8.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5924.

(a) Within the time periods designated in Section 5921 and relating to those factors specified in Section 5923, the Attorney General may do the following:

(1) Contract with, consult, and receive advice from any state agency on those terms and conditions that the Attorney General deems appropriate.

(2) In his or her sole discretion, contract with experts or consultants to assist in reviewing the proposed agreement or transaction.

(b) Contract costs shall not exceed an amount that is reasonable and necessary to conduct the review and evaluation. Any contract entered into under this section shall be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The selling nonprofit corporation, upon request, shall pay the Attorney General promptly for all contract costs.

(c) The Attorney General shall be entitled to reimbursement from the selling nonprofit corporation for all actual, reasonable, direct costs incurred in reviewing, evaluating, and making the determination referred to in Section 5921, including administrative costs. The selling nonprofit corporation shall promptly pay the Attorney General, upon request, for all of those costs.

(d) (1) In order to effectively monitor ongoing compliance with the terms and conditions of any sale or transfer of assets subject to Section 5920, including, but not limited to, the ongoing use of the charitable assets in a manner consistent with the trust pursuant to which they are held, the Attorney General may, in his or her sole discretion, contract with experts and consultants to assist in this regard.

(2) Contract costs shall not exceed an amount that is reasonable and necessary to conduct the review and evaluation. Any contract entered into under this section shall be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The selling nonprofit corporation shall pay the Attorney General promptly for all contract costs.

(3) The Attorney General shall be entitled to reimbursement from either the selling or the acquiring nonprofit corporation, depending upon which one the burden of compliance falls, for all actual, reasonable, and direct costs incurred in monitoring ongoing compliance with the terms and conditions of the sale or transfer of assets, including contract and administrative costs. The Attorney General shall be entitled to this reimbursement for a period of time not to exceed two years after any time period specified in the terms or conditions of sale or transfer of assets. The Attorney General may bill either the selling or the acquiring corporation and the corporation billed by the Attorney General shall promptly pay for all of those costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 427, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5925.

The Attorney General may adopt regulations implementing Sections 5920 to 5924, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 850, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5926.

The Attorney General may enforce conditions imposed on the Attorney General’s consent to an agreement or transaction pursuant to Section 5914 or 5920 to the fullest extent provided by law. In addition to any legal remedies the Attorney General may have, the Attorney General shall be entitled to specific performance, injunctive relief, and other equitable remedies a court deems appropriate for breach of any of the conditions and shall be entitled to recover its attorney’s fees and costs incurred in remedying each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 782, Sec. 9.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5930.

(a) The Attorney General shall prepare a plan for an evaluation of whether additional standards for charitable care and community benefits should be established for private, not-for-profit corporations that operate or control a general acute care hospital as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In preparing the plan, the Attorney General shall consult with representatives of interested parties, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Health facility associations.

(2) Physician organizations.

(3) Consumer groups.

(4) Health care employee organizations.

(5) Community groups.

(6) The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(c) The plan shall provide for the evaluation of all of the following:

(1) The degree to which private, not-for-profit hospitals provide charitable care and community benefits, including the nature of the benefits, the definition of the community, and a comparison of the cost of providing the benefit with the value of the benefits given to the community.

(2) The implications of the relationships among private not-for-profit hospitals and affiliated entities, as defined in Section 5031 of the Corporations Code, for purposes of determining community benefits.

(3) The role of the board of directors of private, not-for-profit hospitals in ensuring benefit to the community.

(d) The plan shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Mergers [6010. - 6022.]



  ARTICLE 1. Merger [6010. - 6019.1.]

6010.

(a) A public benefit corporation may merge with any domestic corporation, foreign corporation (Section 171), or other business entity (Section 5063.5). However, without the prior written consent of the Attorney General, a public benefit corporation may only merge with another public benefit corporation or a religious corporation or a foreign nonprofit corporation or an unincorporated association the governing documents of which provide that its assets are irrevocably dedicated to charitable, religious, or public purposes. In addition, a public benefit corporation that is exempt from the supervisory authority of the Attorney General pursuant to Sections 12581 and 12583 of the Government Code by virtue of being a committee, as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code, that is required to and does file any statement pursuant to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4 of Title 9 of the Government Code, may merge with another public benefit corporation similarly exempt without having to obtain the Attorney General’s consent.

(b) At least 20 days prior to consummation of any merger allowed by subdivision (a), the Attorney General must be provided with a copy of the proposed
 agreement of merger.

(c) Without the prior written consent of the Attorney General, when a merger occurs pursuant to subdivision (a), each member of a constituent corporation may only receive or keep a membership in the surviving corporation for or as a result of the member’s membership in the constituent corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 8.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

The board of each corporation which desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The constituent corporations shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement shall state:

(a) The terms and conditions of the merger;

(b) The amendments, subject to Sections 5810 and 5816, to the articles of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any; if any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation, the new name may be the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing corporation, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 5122;

(c) The amendments to the bylaws of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any;

(d) The name and place of incorporation of each constituent corporation and which of the constituent corporations is the surviving corporation;

(e) The manner, if any, of converting memberships of the constituent corporations into memberships of the surviving corporation; and

(f) Such other details or provisions as are desired, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.
